Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2603.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The following definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Beneficiary" means a person designated to receive a vehicle in a transfer on death title.(2) "Joint owner" means an individual who owns a vehicle concurrently with one or more other individuals with a right of survivorship. "Joint owner" includes a joint tenant with a right to survivorship. "Joint owner" does not include a tenant in common or owner of community property.(3) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.(4) "Transfer on death title" means a vehicle title authorized under this chapter.(5) "Transferor" means a person or joint owners who make a transfer on death title.(6) "Vehicle" has the same meaning as in RCW 46.04.670.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. (1)(a) A person or joint owners may transfer ownership of a vehicle to a beneficiary by a transfer on death title. The transfer is effective at the transferor's death, or for joint owners, at the last surviving transferor's death.(b) A transfer on death title is created through designation of a beneficiary on an application for a certificate of title under RCW 46.12.530 or application for a quick title under RCW 46.12.555, and is effective without: (i) Notice or delivery to or acceptance by the designated beneficiary during the transferor's life; or(ii) Consideration.(2)(a) A transfer on death title is revocable even if another instrument contains a contrary provision.(b) During the transferor's lifetime, the transferor may revoke a transfer on death title by selling or transferring the vehicle or by submitting an application for a new title under chapter 46.12 RCW completed without a designated beneficiary.(3) A transfer on death title is nontestamentary.(4) During a transferor's lifetime, a transfer on death title does not affect an interest or right of the transferor or any other owner, including the right to transfer or encumber the vehicle. The signature or consent of the beneficiary is not required for any transaction relating to the vehicle for which a transfer on death title has been issued.(5) If no beneficiary or beneficiaries survive the owner or joint owners of a vehicle, or if a beneficiary disclaims their interest in their vehicle as provided under chapter 11.86 RCW, the transfer on death title is inoperative and the vehicle is included in the probate estate of the deceased owner.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. This chapter does not:(1) Limit the rights of any creditor of the owner of the vehicle against any transfer on death beneficiary, beneficiaries, or other transferees of the vehicle under any other applicable law; and(2) Affect any other method of transferring an interest in a vehicle otherwise permitted by law.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. This chapter applies to a transfer on death title made in accordance with this chapter before, on, or after the effective date of this section by a transferor dying on or after the effective date of this section.Sec. 5. RCW 11.02.005 and 2021 c 140 s 1012 are each amended to read as follows:When used in this title, unless otherwise required from the context:(1) "Administrator" means a personal representative of the estate of a decedent and the term may be used in lieu of "personal representative" wherever required by context.(2) "Codicil" means a will that modifies or partially revokes an existing earlier will. A codicil need not refer to or be attached to the earlier will.(3) "Degree of kinship" means the degree of kinship as computed according to the rules of the civil law; that is, by counting upward from the intestate to the nearest common ancestor and then downward to the relative, the degree of kinship being the sum of these two counts.(4) "Electronic" means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.(5) "Electronic presence" means the relationship of two or more individuals in different locations communicating in real time to the same extent as if the individuals were physically present in the same location.(6) "Electronic will" means a will or codicil executed in compliance with RCW 11.12.400 through 11.12.491.(7) "Executor" means a personal representative of the estate of a decedent appointed by will and the term may be used in lieu of "personal representative" wherever required by context.(8) "Guardian," "limited guardian," "conservator," or "limited conservator" means a personal representative of the person or estate of a person who has been placed under a guardianship under RCW 11.130.265 or who has been placed under a conservatorship under RCW 11.130.360 and the term may be used in lieu of "personal representative" wherever required by context.(9) "Heirs" denotes those persons, including the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner, who are entitled under the statutes of intestate succession to the real and personal property of a decedent on the decedent's death intestate.(10) "Internal revenue code" means the United States internal revenue code of 1986, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2001.(11) "Issue" means all the lineal descendants of an individual. An adopted individual is a lineal descendant of each of his or her adoptive parents and of all individuals with regard to which each adoptive parent is a lineal descendant. A child conceived prior to the death of a parent but born after the death of the deceased parent is considered to be the surviving issue of the deceased parent for purposes of this title.(12) "Net estate" refers to the real and personal property of a decedent exclusive of homestead rights, exempt property, the family allowance and enforceable claims against, and debts of, the deceased or the estate.(13) "Nonprobate asset" means those rights and interests of a person having beneficial ownership of an asset that pass on the person's death under a written instrument or arrangement other than the person's will. "Nonprobate asset" includes, but is not limited to, a right or interest passing under a joint tenancy with right of survivorship, joint bank account with right of survivorship, transfer on death deed, transfer on death title under section 2 of this act, payable on death or trust bank account, transfer on death security or security account, deed or conveyance if possession has been postponed until the death of the person, trust of which the person is grantor and that becomes effective or irrevocable only upon the person's death, community property agreement, individual retirement account or bond, or note or other contract the payment or performance of which is affected by the death of the person. "Nonprobate asset" does not include: A payable-on-death provision of a life insurance policy, annuity, or other similar contract, or of an employee benefit plan; a right or interest passing by descent and distribution under chapter 11.04 RCW; a right or interest if, before death, the person has irrevocably transferred the right or interest, the person has waived the power to transfer it or, in the case of contractual arrangement, the person has waived the unilateral right to rescind or modify the arrangement; or a right or interest held by the person solely in a fiduciary capacity. For the definition of "nonprobate asset" relating to revocation of a provision for a former spouse upon dissolution of marriage or declaration of invalidity of marriage, RCW 11.07.010(5) applies. For the definition of "nonprobate asset" relating to testamentary disposition of nonprobate assets, see RCW 11.11.010(7).(14) "Personal representative" includes executor, administrator, special administrator, and conservator or limited conservator and special representative.(15) "Real estate" includes, except as otherwise specifically provided herein, all lands, tenements, and hereditaments, and all rights thereto, and all interest therein possessed and claimed in fee simple, or for the life of a third person.(16) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.(17) "Representation" refers to a method of determining distribution in which the takers are in unequal degrees of kinship with respect to a decedent, and is accomplished as follows: After first determining who, of those entitled to share in the estate, are in the nearest degree of kinship, the estate is divided into equal shares, the number of shares being the sum of the number of persons who survive the decedent who are in the nearest degree of kinship and the number of persons in the same degree of kinship who died before the decedent but who left issue surviving the decedent; each share of a deceased person in the nearest degree must be divided among those of the deceased person's issue who survive the decedent and have no ancestor then living who is in the line of relationship between them and the decedent, those more remote in degree taking together the share which their ancestor would have taken had he or she survived the decedent.(18) References to "section 2033A" of the internal revenue code in wills, trust agreements, powers of appointment, beneficiary designations, and other instruments governed by or subject to this title are deemed to refer to the comparable or corresponding provisions of section 2057 of the internal revenue code, as added by section 6006(b) of the internal revenue service restructuring act of 1998 (H.R. 2676, P.L. 105-206); and references to the section 2033A "exclusion" are deemed to mean the section 2057 deduction.(19) "Settlor" has the same meaning as provided for "trustor" in this section.(20) "Special administrator" means a personal representative of the estate of a decedent appointed for limited purposes and the term may be used in lieu of "personal representative" wherever required by context.(21) "Surviving spouse" or "surviving domestic partner" does not include an individual whose marriage to or state registered domestic partnership with the decedent has been terminated, dissolved, or invalidated unless, by virtue of a subsequent marriage or state registered domestic partnership, he or she is married to or in a domestic partnership with the decedent at the time of death. A decree of separation that does not terminate the status of spouses or domestic partners is not a dissolution or invalidation for purposes of this subsection.(22) "Trustee" means an original, added, or successor trustee and includes the state, or any agency thereof, when it is acting as the trustee of a trust to which chapter 11.98 RCW applies.(23) "Trustor" means a person, including a testator, who creates, or contributes property to, a trust.(24) "Will" means an instrument validly executed as required by RCW 11.12.020 or 11.12.400 through 11.12.491.Words that import the singular number may also be applied to the plural of persons and things.Words importing the masculine gender only may be extended to females also.Sec. 6. RCW 11.07.010 and 2014 c 58 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:(1) This section applies to all nonprobate assets, wherever situated, held at the time of entry of a decree of dissolution of marriage or state registered domestic partnership or a declaration of invalidity or certification of termination of a state registered domestic partnership.(2)(a) If a marriage or state registered domestic partnership is dissolved or invalidated, or a state registered domestic partnership terminated, a provision made prior to that event that relates to the payment or transfer at death of the decedent's interest in a nonprobate asset in favor of or granting an interest or power to the decedent's former spouse or state registered domestic partner, is revoked. A provision affected by this section must be interpreted, and the nonprobate asset affected passes, as if the former spouse or former state registered domestic partner, failed to survive the decedent, having died at the time of entry of the decree of dissolution or declaration of invalidity or termination of state registered domestic partnership.(b) This subsection does not apply if and to the extent that:(i) The instrument governing disposition of the nonprobate asset expressly provides otherwise;(ii) The decree of dissolution, declaration of invalidity, or other court order requires that the decedent maintain a nonprobate asset for the benefit of a former spouse or former state registered domestic partner or children of the marriage or domestic partnership, payable on the decedent's death either outright or in trust, and other nonprobate assets of the decedent fulfilling such a requirement for the benefit of the former spouse or former state registered domestic partner or children of the marriage or domestic partnership do not exist at the decedent's death;(iii) A court order requires that the decedent maintain a nonprobate asset for the benefit of another, payable on the decedent's death either outright or in a trust, and other nonprobate assets of the decedent fulfilling such a requirement do not exist at the decedent's death; or(iv) If not for this subsection, the decedent could not have effected the revocation by unilateral action because of the terms of the decree, declaration, termination of state registered domestic partnership, or for any other reason, immediately after the entry of the decree of dissolution, declaration of invalidity, or termination of state registered domestic partnership.(3)(a) A payor or other third party in possession or control of a nonprobate asset at the time of the decedent's death is not liable for making a payment or transferring an interest in a nonprobate asset to a decedent's former spouse or state registered domestic partner, whose interest in the nonprobate asset is revoked under this section, or for taking another action in reliance on the validity of the instrument governing disposition of the nonprobate asset, before the payor or other third party has actual knowledge of the dissolution or other invalidation of marriage or termination of the state registered domestic partnership. A payor or other third party is liable for a payment or transfer made or other action taken after the payor or other third party has actual knowledge of a revocation under this section.(b) This section does not require a payor or other third party to pay or transfer a nonprobate asset to a beneficiary designated in a governing instrument affected by the dissolution or other invalidation of marriage or termination of state registered domestic partnership, or to another person claiming an interest in the nonprobate asset, if the payor or third party has actual knowledge of the existence of a dispute between the former spouse or former state registered domestic partner, and the beneficiaries or other persons concerning rights of ownership of the nonprobate asset as a result of the application of this section among the former spouse or former state registered domestic partner, and the beneficiaries or among other persons, or if the payor or third party is otherwise uncertain as to who is entitled to the nonprobate asset under this section. In such a case, the payor or third party may, without liability, notify in writing all beneficiaries or other persons claiming an interest in the nonprobate asset of either the existence of the dispute or its uncertainty as to who is entitled to payment or transfer of the nonprobate asset. The payor or third party may also, without liability, refuse to pay or transfer a nonprobate asset in such a circumstance to a beneficiary or other person claiming an interest until the time that either:(i) All beneficiaries and other interested persons claiming an interest have consented in writing to the payment or transfer; or(ii) The payment or transfer is authorized or directed by a court of proper jurisdiction.(c) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section and (a) and (b) of this subsection, a payor or other third party having actual knowledge of the existence of a dispute between beneficiaries or other persons concerning rights to a nonprobate asset as a result of the application of this section may condition the payment or transfer of the nonprobate asset on execution, in a form and with security acceptable to the payor or other third party, of a bond in an amount that is double the fair market value of the nonprobate asset at the time of the decedent's death or the amount of an adverse claim, whichever is the lesser, or of a similar instrument to provide security to the payor or other third party, indemnifying the payor or other third party for any liability, loss, damage, costs, and expenses for and on account of payment or transfer of the nonprobate asset.(d) As used in this subsection, "actual knowledge" means, for a payor or other third party in possession or control of the nonprobate asset at or following the decedent's death, written notice to the payor or other third party, or to an officer of a payor or third party in the course of his or her employment, received after the decedent's death and within a time that is sufficient to afford the payor or third party a reasonable opportunity to act upon the knowledge. The notice must identify the nonprobate asset with reasonable specificity. The notice also must be sufficient to inform the payor or other third party of the revocation of the provisions in favor of the decedent's spouse or state registered domestic partner, by reason of the dissolution or invalidation of marriage or termination of state registered domestic partnership, or to inform the payor or third party of a dispute concerning rights to a nonprobate asset as a result of the application of this section. Receipt of the notice for a period of more than ((thirty))30 days is presumed to be received within a time that is sufficient to afford the payor or third party a reasonable opportunity to act upon the knowledge, but receipt of the notice for a period of less than five business days is presumed not to be a sufficient time for these purposes. These presumptions may be rebutted only by clear and convincing evidence to the contrary.(4)(a) A person who purchases a nonprobate asset from a former spouse, former state registered domestic partner, or other person, for value and without actual knowledge, or who receives from a former spouse, former state registered domestic partner, or other person payment or transfer of a nonprobate asset without actual knowledge and in partial or full satisfaction of a legally enforceable obligation, is neither obligated under this section to return the payment, property, or benefit nor is liable under this section for the amount of the payment or the value of the nonprobate asset. However, a former spouse, former state registered domestic partner, or other person who, with actual knowledge, not for value, or not in satisfaction of a legally enforceable obligation, receives payment or transfer of a nonprobate asset to which that person is not entitled under this section is obligated to return the payment or nonprobate asset, or is personally liable for the amount of the payment or value of the nonprobate asset, to the person who is entitled to it under this section.(b) As used in this subsection, "actual knowledge" means, for a person described in (a) of this subsection who purchases or receives a nonprobate asset from a former spouse, former state registered domestic partner, or other person, personal knowledge or possession of documents relating to the revocation upon dissolution or invalidation of marriage of provisions relating to the payment or transfer at the decedent's death of the nonprobate asset, received within a time after the decedent's death and before the purchase or receipt that is sufficient to afford the person purchasing or receiving the nonprobate asset reasonable opportunity to act upon the knowledge. Receipt of the personal knowledge or possession of the documents for a period of more than ((thirty))30 days is presumed to be received within a time that is sufficient to afford the payor or third party a reasonable opportunity to act upon the knowledge, but receipt of the notice for a period of less than five business days is presumed not to be a sufficient time for these purposes. These presumptions may be rebutted only by clear and convincing evidence to the contrary.(5)(a) As used in this section, "nonprobate asset" means those rights and interests of a person having beneficial ownership of an asset that pass on the person's death under only the following written instruments or arrangements other than the decedent's will:(i) A payable-on-death provision of a life insurance policy, employee benefit plan, annuity or similar contract, or individual retirement account, unless provided otherwise by controlling federal law;(ii) A payable-on-death, trust, or joint with right of survivorship bank account;(iii) A trust of which the person is a grantor and that becomes effective or irrevocable only upon the person's death;(iv) Transfer on death beneficiary designations of a transfer on death or pay on death security, or joint tenancy or joint tenancy with right of survivorship designations of a security, if such designations are authorized under Washington law;(v) A transfer on death, pay on death, joint tenancy, or joint tenancy with right of survivorship brokerage account;(vi) A transfer on death deed, or transfer on death title under section 2 of this act;(vii) Unless otherwise specifically provided therein, a contract wherein payment or performance under that contract is affected by the death of the person; or(viii) Unless otherwise specifically provided therein, any other written instrument of transfer, within the meaning of RCW 11.02.091(3), containing a provision for the nonprobate transfer of an asset at death.(b) For the general definition in this title of "nonprobate asset," see RCW 11.02.005(((10)))(13) and for the definition of "nonprobate asset" relating to testamentary disposition of nonprobate assets, see RCW 11.11.010(7). For the purposes of this chapter, a "bank account" includes an account into or from which cash deposits and withdrawals can be made, and includes demand deposit accounts, time deposit accounts, money market accounts, or certificates of deposit, maintained at a bank, savings and loan association, credit union, brokerage house, or similar financial institution.(6) This section is remedial in nature and applies as of July 25, 1993, to decrees of dissolution and declarations of invalidity entered after July 24, 1993, and this section applies as of January 1, 1995, to decrees of dissolution and declarations of invalidity entered before July 25, 1993.Sec. 7. RCW 11.11.010 and 2014 c 58 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1)(a) "Actual knowledge" means:(i) For a financial institution, whether acting as personal representative or otherwise, or other third party in possession or control of a nonprobate asset, receipt of written notice that: (A) Complies with RCW 11.11.050; (B) pertains to the testamentary disposition or ownership of a nonprobate asset in its possession or control; and (C) is received by the financial institution or third party after the death of the owner in a time sufficient to afford the financial institution or third party a reasonable opportunity to act upon the knowledge; and(ii) For a personal representative that is not a financial institution, personal knowledge or possession of documents relating to the testamentary disposition or ownership of a nonprobate asset of the owner sufficient to afford the personal representative reasonable opportunity to act upon the knowledge, including reasonable opportunity for the personal representative to provide the written notice under RCW 11.11.050.(b) For the purposes of (a) of this subsection, notice of more than ((thirty))30 days is presumed to be notice that is sufficient to afford the party a reasonable opportunity to act upon the knowledge, but notice of less than five business days is presumed not to be a sufficient notice for these purposes. These presumptions may be rebutted only by clear and convincing evidence to the contrary.(2) "Beneficiary" means the person designated to receive a nonprobate asset upon the death of the owner by means other than the owner's will.(3) "Broker" means a person defined as a broker or dealer under the federal securities laws.(4) "Date of will" means, as to any nonprobate asset, the date of signature of the will or codicil that refers to the asset and disposes of it.(5) "Designate" means a written means by which the owner selects a beneficiary((,)) including, but not limited to, instruments under contractual arrangements and registration of accounts, and "designation" means the selection.(6) "Financial institution" means: A bank, trust company, mutual savings bank, savings and loan association, credit union, broker, or issuer of stock or its transfer agent.(7)(a) "Nonprobate asset" means a nonprobate asset within the meaning of RCW 11.02.005, but excluding the following:(i) A right or interest in real property passing under a joint tenancy with right of survivorship;(ii) A deed or conveyance for which possession has been postponed until the death of the owner;(iii) A transfer on death deed, or transfer on death title under section 2 of this act;(iv) A right or interest passing under a community property agreement; and(v) An individual retirement account or bond.(b) For the definition of "nonprobate asset" relating to revocation of a provision for a former spouse or former domestic partner upon dissolution of marriage or state registered domestic partnership or declaration of invalidity of marriage or state registered domestic partnership, see RCW 11.07.010(5).(8) "Owner" means a person who, during life, has beneficial ownership of the nonprobate asset.(9) "Request" means a request by the beneficiary for transfer of a nonprobate asset after the death of the owner, if it complies with all conditions of the arrangement, including reasonable special requirements concerning necessary signatures and regulations of the financial institution or other third party, or by the personal representative of the owner's estate or the testamentary beneficiary, if it complies with the owner's will and any additional conditions of the financial institution or third party for such transfer.(10) "Testamentary beneficiary" means a person named under the owner's will to receive a nonprobate asset under this chapter, including but not limited to the trustee of a testamentary trust.(11) "Third party" means a person, including a financial institution, having possession of or control over a nonprobate asset at the death of the owner, including the trustee of a revocable living trust and surviving joint tenant or tenants.Sec. 8. RCW 11.86.011 and 2014 c 58 s 22 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.(1) "Beneficiary" means the person entitled, but for the person's disclaimer, to take an interest.(2) "Creator of the interest" means a person who establishes, declares, or otherwise creates an interest.(3)(a) "Date of the transfer" means:(i) For an inter vivos transfer, the date of the creation of the interest; or(ii) For a transfer upon the death of the creator of the interest, the date of the death of the creator.(b) A joint tenancy interest of a deceased joint tenant is deemed to be transferred at the death of the joint tenant rather than at the creation of the joint tenancy.(4) "Disclaimant" means a beneficiary who executes a disclaimer on his or her own behalf or a person who executes a disclaimer on behalf of a beneficiary.(5) "Disclaimer" means any writing ((which))that declines, refuses, renounces, or disclaims any interest that would otherwise be taken by a beneficiary.(6) "Interest" includes the whole of any property, real or personal, legal or equitable, or any fractional part, share, or particular portion or specific assets thereof, any vested or contingent interest in any such property, any power to appoint, consume, apply, or expend property, or any other right, power, privilege, or immunity relating to property. "Interest" includes, but is not limited to, an interest created in any of the following manners:(a) By intestate succession;(b) Under a will;(c) Under a trust;(d) By succession to a disclaimed interest;(e) By virtue of an election to take against a will;(f) By creation of a power of appointment;(g) By exercise or nonexercise of a power of appointment;(h) By an inter vivos gift, whether outright or in trust;(i) By surviving the death of a depositor of a trust or P.O.D. account within the meaning of RCW ((30.22.040))30A.22.040;(j) Under an insurance or annuity contract;(k) By surviving the death of another joint tenant;(l) Under an employee benefit plan;(m) Under an individual retirement account, annuity, or bond;(n) Under a community property agreement;(o) By surviving the death of a transferor ((of)), a transfer on death deed, or a transfer on death title; or(p) Any other interest created by any testamentary or inter vivos instrument or by operation of law.(7) "Person" means an individual, corporation, government, governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, or other entity.Sec. 9. RCW 46.12.540 and 2010 c 161 s 305 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department shall issue an electronic record of ownership or a written certificate of title if the department is satisfied from the statements on the application that the applicant is the legal owner of the vehicle or otherwise entitled to have a certificate of title in the applicant's name.(2) Each certificate of title issued by the department must contain:(a) The date of application;(b) The certificate of title number assigned to the vehicle;(c) The name and address of the registered owner and legal owner;(d) The vehicle identification number;(e) The mileage reading, if required, as provided by the odometer disclosure statement submitted with the application involving a transfer of ownership;(f) A notation that the recorded mileage is actual, not actual, or exceeds mechanical limits;(g) A blank space on the face of the certificate of title for the signature of the registered owner;(h) Information on whether the vehicle was ever registered and operated as an exempt vehicle or taxicab;(i) A brand conspicuously shown across its front if indicating that the vehicle has been rebuilt after becoming a salvage vehicle;(j) The director's signature and the seal of the department; ((and))(k) For a transfer on death title as provided in section 2 of this act, the designated beneficiary immediately preceded by "TRANSFER ON DEATH" or the abbreviation "TOD"; and(l) Any other description of the vehicle and facts the department may require.(3) The department shall deliver the registration certificate to the registered owner and the certificate of title to the legal owner, or both to the person who is both the registered owner and legal owner.Sec. 10. RCW 46.12.530 and 2019 c 232 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The application for a certificate of title of a vehicle must be made by the owner or owner's representative to the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director on a form furnished or approved by the department and must contain:(a) A description of the vehicle, including make, model, vehicle identification number, type of body, and the odometer reading at the time of delivery of the vehicle;(b) The name and address of the person who is to be the registered owner of the vehicle and, if the vehicle is subject to a security interest, the name and address of the secured party; and(c) Other information the department may require.(2) The department may require additional information and a physical examination of the vehicle or of any class of vehicles, or either.(3) The application for a certificate of title must contain a transfer on death option to designate a beneficiary as provided in section 2 of this act.(4) The application for a certificate of title must be signed by the person applying to be the registered owner and be sworn to by that person in the manner described under chapter 5.50 RCW. The department shall keep the application in the original, computer, or photostatic form.(((4)))(5) The application for an original certificate of title must be accompanied by:(a) A draft, money order, certified bank check, or cash for all fees and taxes due for the application for certificate of title; and(b) The most recent certificate of title or other satisfactory evidence of ownership.(((5)))(6) Once issued, a certificate of title is not subject to renewal.(((6)))(7) Whenever any person, after applying for or receiving a certificate of title, moves from the address named in the application or in the certificate of title issued to him or her, or changes his or her name of record, the person shall, within ((ten))10 days thereafter, notify the department of the name or address change as provided in RCW 46.08.195.Sec. 11. RCW 46.12.555 and 2019 c 232 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The application for a quick title of a vehicle must be submitted by the owner or the owner's representative to the department, participating county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director on a form furnished or approved by the department and must contain:(a) A description of the vehicle, including make, model, vehicle identification number, type of body, and the odometer reading at the time of delivery of the vehicle, when required;(b) The name and address of the person who is to be the registered owner of the vehicle and, if the vehicle is subject to a security interest, the name and address of the secured party; and(c) Other information as may be required by the department.(2) The application for a quick title must contain a transfer on death option to designate a beneficiary as provided in section 2 of this act.(3) The application for a quick title must be signed by the person applying to be the registered owner and be sworn to by that person in the manner described under chapter 5.50 RCW. The department must keep a copy of the application.(((3)))(4) The application for a quick title must be accompanied by:(a) All fees and taxes due for an application for a certificate of title, including a quick title service fee under RCW 46.17.160; and(b) The most recent certificate of title or other satisfactory evidence of ownership.(((4)))(5) All applications for quick title must meet the requirements established by the department.(((5)))(6) For the purposes of this section, "quick title" means a certificate of title printed at the time of application.(((6)))(7) The quick title process authorized under this section may not be used to obtain the first title issued to a vehicle previously designated as a salvage vehicle as defined in RCW 46.04.514.(((7)))(8) A subagent may process a quick title under this section in accordance with rules adopted by the department.Sec. 12. RCW 46.12.670 and 2010 c 161 s 313 and 2010 c 8 s 9005 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) The department shall file and index certificates of title when assigned and returned to the department, together with subsequent transactions so that at all times it will be possible to trace ownership to the vehicle designated on each certificate of title.(2)(a) ((A))Except as provided under (c) of this subsection, a person who acquires an interest in a vehicle, other than by voluntary transfer, shall within ((fifteen))15 days mail or deliver to the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director:(i) The last certificate of title if available;(ii) Proof of transfer; and(iii) An application for a new certificate of title.(b) This subsection shall not apply to transactions described in subsection (4) of this section.(c) A person who acquires an interest in a vehicle under a transfer on death title as provided in section 2 of this act must submit the following to transfer ownership:(i) The last certificate of title if available;(ii) A death certificate for the previous owner; and(iii) An application for a new certificate of title.(3) A secured party named in the certificate of title who repossesses a vehicle under a security agreement shall within ((fifteen))15 days mail or deliver to the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director:(a) The last certificate of title;(b) An application for a new certificate of title; and(c) An affidavit made by or on the behalf of the secured party that the vehicle was repossessed and that the interest of the owner was lawfully terminated or sold under the terms of the security agreement.(4) A secured party named in the certificate of title who holds the vehicle for resale is not required to apply for a new certificate of title. When the vehicle is sold, the secured party shall promptly mail or deliver to the buyer or to the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director:(a) The certificate of title;(b) An affidavit made by or on the behalf of the secured party that the vehicle was repossessed and that the interest of the owner was lawfully terminated or sold under the terms of the security agreement; and(c) Any other documents required to be sent to the department by the buyer.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 13. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 14. Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 11 RCW.--- END ---